Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-1452
Body-worn cameras; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-1452 to 81-1454, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Body-worn camera means a device worn by a peace officer in uniform which has the capability to record both audio and video of an interaction between a peace officer and a member of the public but does not include any device used by a plain clothes officer;

(2) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice;

(3) Law enforcement agency means an agency or department of this state or of any political subdivision of this state which is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime, the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of this state or any political subdivision of this state, and the enforcement of arrest warrants. Law enforcement agency includes a police department, an office of a town marshal, an office of a county sheriff, the Nebraska State Patrol, and any department to which a deputy state sheriff is assigned as provided in section 84-106; and

(4) Peace officer means any officer or employee of a law enforcement agency authorized by law to make arrests.

Laws 2016, LB1000, § 1.
July 21, 2016